Hawaii, session 2026, HB2335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§76-     Interns; eligible for internal recruitment.  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an intern who has completed at least four hundred eighty hours of work experience acquired through a state-funded internship or workforce development program within a department or agency of the State shall be deemed eligible for internal recruitment within that department or agency." SECTION 2.  Section 76-22.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending subsection (a) to read: "(a)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a state department, division, or agency, rather than the department of human resources development, may conduct a minimum qualification review of applicants for vacant positions within that department, division, or agency.  In conducting a minimum qualification review, the state department, division, or agency, may: (1)  Consider required minimum qualifications as desired qualifications; (2)  Allow certain community college development programs to be substituted for required or desired experience; and (3)  Allow internships with state departments, divisions, and agencies to be substituted for required or desired experience; provided that the department of health shall specify any minimum qualification requirement or substitute in the recruitment posting." 2.  By amending subsection (c) to read: "(c)  [Upon completing the minimum qualification review of applicants for a vacancy, the state department, division, or agency shall submit to the department of human resources development the applications for individuals who have met the minimum qualifications for the vacancy; provided that the] A state department, division, or agency may immediately begin interviewing applicants that [have been] the department, division, or agency has determined to meet the minimum qualifications for the vacant position.  [The department of human resources development shall complete any other tasks necessary to facilitate the hiring of the applicants, including auditing and correcting any errors found in the minimum qualification review, as applicable; provided further that if any errors are found, the department of human resources development shall have five working days to correct the error and notify the state department, division, or agency.] The director or head of the state department, division, or agency may directly hire an individual into a civil service position; provided that the individual meets the minimum qualifications for the position." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2077.